Louisiana, session 2026, SB273.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2009.26 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2009.26. Hospice care in inpatient licensed facilities
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:
(1) Patients receiving hospice care are among the most medically
vulnerable residents of this state.
(2) If hospice services are provided to a patient in a licensed facility other
than an inpatient hospice facility, there may be multiple providers sharing
responsibility for the patient which can create potential confusion regarding
accountability, communication, and care coordination.
(3) Families play an essential role in safeguarding patient dignity and
ensuring proper communication between providers.
(4) When patients in licensed facilities are receiving hospice care, there
must be additional patient protections implemented to protect the hospice
patient from neglect, miscommunication, or loss of continuity of care,
particularly when patients are transferred between one or more licensed
facilities.
B. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Facility" means a nursing facility, assisted living facility, or licensed
residential care setting providing inpatient care.
(2) "Hospice provider" means any licensed hospice agency operating
within this state in accordance with R.S. 40:2181 et seq.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 273 ENROLLED
C. Patients receiving hospice care in a facility shall have the right to all
of the following:
(1) Comfort-focused care consistent with medical judgment.
(2) Respectful communication among providers and families.
(3) Clear explanation of care decisions affecting hydration, nutrition, or
visitation.
D.(1) When a patient in a facility is enrolled in hospice care, a patient
specific written care plan shall be completed and maintained in the patient
record identifying, at a minimum all of the following:
(a) The patient's hospice provider.
(b) The provider that controls medical orders.
(c) The provider responsible for daily hydration, nutrition, and routine
care.
(d) The authorized point of contact for the patient's family or patient's
authorized representative.
(2) The care plan shall be made available to the patient and the patient's
authorized family member or patient's authorized representative upon request.
E.(1) If a hospice patient is transferred or relocated from one facility to
another, the transferring facility shall notify the patient's hospice provider and
the patient's family or patient's authorized representative as soon as
practicable.
(2) The notification shall include the patient's current care plan and a
notice that a new care plan shall be developed within twenty-four hours of the
patient being transferred to the receiving facility.
(3) Failure to execute the notice provisions of Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection shall constitute a reportable incident that the transferring facility
submits to the department.
(4) Failure to execute the new care plan provisions of Paragraph (1) of
this Subsection shall constitute a reportable incident that the receiving facility
submits to the department.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 273 ENROLLED
F.(1) Every facility with a patient receiving hospice care shall maintain
a detailed patient log of all of the following:
(a) Any offer of food and fluid.
(b) Patient acceptance or refusal of the offer of food and fluid.
(c) The provider issuing a directive or order and his clinical justification
for hydration or nutrition being withheld from a hospice patient.
(2) The patient log required by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall be
made available to the patient's hospice provider and to the patient's family or
patient's authorized representative, upon request.
G.(1) A facility shall not retaliate against or restrict access to a patient's
family or patient's authorized representative because concerns were raised
regarding patient care.
(2) Any facility restriction on visitation or access to a hospice patient
shall be ordered by a provider who is identified, clinically justified, documented
in writing, and communicated to the patient's family or patient's authorized
representative prior to the restriction being implemented.
H. If the Louisiana Department of Health receives a complaint alleging
a violation of this Section, the department may conduct a complaint survey that
may include a review of the facility's care plans. The provider shall issue a plan
of correction to any deficiencies cited by the department. The department may
issue directed plans of correction or assess administrative penalties as
determined by the department.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.